Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.010

Authority for incorporation—Number of inhabitants required. (Effective until June 30, 2028.)

Any contiguous area containing not less than 1,500 inhabitants lying outside the limits of an incorporated city or town may become incorporated as a city or town operating under Title 35 or 35A RCW as provided in this chapter.

[ 2023 c 82 s 1; 1994 c 216 s 12; 1986 c 234 s 2; 1969 c 48 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.010. Prior: 1963 c 57 s 1; 1890 p 131 s 1; 1888 p 221 s 1; 1877 p 173 s 1; 1871 p 51 s 1; RRS s 8883.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2023 c 82 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2028." [ 2023 c 82 s 3.]

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.

Validation of certain incorporations and annexations—Municipal corporations of the fourth class—1961 ex.s. c 16: See note following RCW 35.21.010.

Validating—1899 c 61: "Any municipal corporation which has been incorporated under the existing laws of this state shall be a valid municipal corporation notwithstanding a failure to publish the notice of the election held or to be held for the purpose of determining whether such city should or shall become incorporated, for the length of time required by law governing such incorporation: PROVIDED, A notice fulfilling in other respects the requirements of law shall have been published for one week prior to such election in a newspaper printed and published within the boundaries of the corporation." [1899 c 61 p 103 s 1.]

Validating—1893 c 80: "The incorporation of all cities and towns in this state heretofore had or attempted under sections one, two and three of an act entitled 'An act providing for the organization, classification, incorporation and government of municipal corporations, and declaring an emergency,' approved March 24, 1890, and the reincorporation of all cities and towns in this state heretofore had or attempted under sections one, four and five of said act, under which attempted incorporation or reincorporation an organized government has been maintained since the date thereof, is hereby for all purposes declared legal and valid, and such cities and towns are hereby declared duly incorporated. And all contracts and obligations heretofore made, entered into or incurred by any such city or town so incorporated or reincorporated are hereby declared legal and valid and of full force and effect." [1893 c 80 p 183 s 1.]

Validating—1890 c 7: "When so incorporated, the debts due from such town, village or city to any person, firm or corporation may be assumed and paid by the municipal authorities of such town, village or city; and all debts due to such town, village or city from any person, firm or corporation shall be deemed ratified, and may be collected in the same manner and in all respects as though such original incorporation were valid." [1890 c 7 p 136 s 7.]

PDFRCW 35.02.010

Authority for incorporation—Number of inhabitants required. (Effective June 30, 2028.)

Any contiguous area containing not less than 1,500 inhabitants lying outside the limits of an incorporated city or town may become incorporated as a city or town operating under Title 35 or 35A RCW as provided in this chapter: PROVIDED, That no area which lies within five air miles of the boundary of any city having a population of 15,000 or more shall be incorporated which contains less than 3,000 inhabitants.

[ 2023 c 82 s 2; 1994 c 216 s 12; 1986 c 234 s 2; 1969 c 48 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.010. Prior: 1963 c 57 s 1; 1890 p 131 s 1; 1888 p 221 s 1; 1877 p 173 s 1; 1871 p 51 s 1; RRS s 8883.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 82 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30, 2028." [ 2023 c 82 s 4.]

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.

Validation of certain incorporations and annexations—Municipal corporations of the fourth class—1961 ex.s. c 16: See note following RCW 35.21.010.

Validating—1899 c 61: "Any municipal corporation which has been incorporated under the existing laws of this state shall be a valid municipal corporation notwithstanding a failure to publish the notice of the election held or to be held for the purpose of determining whether such city should or shall become incorporated, for the length of time required by law governing such incorporation: PROVIDED, A notice fulfilling in other respects the requirements of law shall have been published for one week prior to such election in a newspaper printed and published within the boundaries of the corporation." [1899 c 61 p 103 s 1.]

Validating—1893 c 80: "The incorporation of all cities and towns in this state heretofore had or attempted under sections one, two and three of an act entitled 'An act providing for the organization, classification, incorporation and government of municipal corporations, and declaring an emergency,' approved March 24, 1890, and the reincorporation of all cities and towns in this state heretofore had or attempted under sections one, four and five of said act, under which attempted incorporation or reincorporation an organized government has been maintained since the date thereof, is hereby for all purposes declared legal and valid, and such cities and towns are hereby declared duly incorporated. And all contracts and obligations heretofore made, entered into or incurred by any such city or town so incorporated or reincorporated are hereby declared legal and valid and of full force and effect." [1893 c 80 p 183 s 1.]

Validating—1890 c 7: "When so incorporated, the debts due from such town, village or city to any person, firm or corporation may be assumed and paid by the municipal authorities of such town, village or city; and all debts due to such town, village or city from any person, firm or corporation shall be deemed ratified, and may be collected in the same manner and in all respects as though such original incorporation were valid." [1890 c 7 p 136 s 7.]